Virginia statutes. Title 35.1. Hotels, Restaurants, Summer Camps, and Campgrounds.
Chapter 3. Licenses; Inspections.

§ 35.1-18.
License required; name in which issued; not assignable or transferable.

No person shall own, establish, conduct, maintain, manage, or operate any hotel, restaurant, summer camp, or campground in this Commonwealth unless the hotel, restaurant, summer camp, or campground is licensed as provided in this chapter. The license shall be in the name of the owner or lessee. No license issued hereunder shall be assignable or transferable. The Board shall not issue a license to the owner or lessee of any hotel, summer camp or campground in this Commonwealth that maintains, or conducts as any part of its activities, a nudist camp for juveniles. A “nudist camp for juveniles” is defined to be a hotel, summer camp or campground that is attended by openly nude juveniles whose parent, grandparent, or legal guardian is not also registered for and present with the juvenile at the same camp.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 35-22, 35-26, 35-44; 1981, c. 468; 2004, c. 987.

Cross references.

As to the applicability of subdivision ordinances to mobile homes, see §

15.2-2247

.

As to dual licenses for certain day
centers which also meet the requirements for a license as a summer camp under §

35.1-18

, see § 63.2-1810.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 639, cl. 1 provides: “§ 2. Exemptions to licensure requirements of restaurants.

“Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapters 3 (§

35.1-18

et seq.) and 4 (§

35.1-25

et seq.) of Title 35.1, the requirements for the licensure of restaurants shall not apply to community centers when holding occasional dinners and bazaars of one or two days’ duration, at which food prepared in the homes of members or in the kitchen of the community center is offered for sale to the public.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 987 added the last two sentences.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 3.

§ 35.1-19.
Person deemed responsible for campground.

In the event that the Commissioner or his designee cannot establish which person is responsible for a campground, the owner of the parcel of land upon which the campground lies shall be deemed to be the person responsible for obtaining a license and meeting the requirements of this title and the applicable rules and regulations for retaining a license.

History.

1981, c. 468.

§ 35.1-20.
Issuance and denial of licenses.

The Commissioner shall issue a license for each hotel, restaurant, summer camp, and campground which, after inspection, is found to be in compliance with all applicable regulations and provisions of this title. The Commissioner shall notify by certified mail any applicant denied a license of the reasons for such denial.

History.

1981, c. 468.

§ 35.1-21.
Display of hotel, restaurant, summer camp, and campground licenses.

As used in this section, “mobile food unit” means a restaurant that is mounted on wheels and readily moveable from place to place at all times during operation.

The license of each hotel, restaurant, summer camp, and campground issued pursuant to this chapter shall be prominently displayed.

The Department shall issue a license in the form of a sticker to a restaurant that is a mobile food unit that meets the requirements of this chapter, which license shall be prominently displayed on the mobile food unit.

History.

Code 1950, § 35-26; 1981, c. 468; 2017, c. 281.

Cross references.

As to license requirements for mobile food units, see §

58.1-3715.1

.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 281 designated the existing language as subsection B, and added subsections A and C.

§ 35.1-22.
Periodic inspections.

The Commissioner shall cause each restaurant, summer camp, and campground in the Commonwealth to be inspected at least annually, with no more than 12 months elapsing between each such inspection, in accordance with applicable provisions of this title and the regulations of the Board. However, no restaurant, summer camp, or campground shall receive additional inspections until all other restaurants, summer camps, or campgrounds in that locality, as defined in §

15.2-102

, respectively, have also been inspected, unless the additional inspections are (i) necessary to follow up on a preoperational inspection or one or more violations; (ii) required by a uniformly applied risk-based schedule established by the Department; (iii) necessary to investigate a complaint regarding the restaurant, summer camp, or campground; or (iv) otherwise deemed necessary by the Commissioner or his designee to protect the health and safety of the public.

The Commissioner, as he deems appropriate, shall cause each hotel in the Commonwealth to be inspected in accordance with applicable provisions of this title and the regulations of the Board. However, no hotel shall receive additional inspections until all other hotels in that locality, as defined in §

15.2-102

, have also been inspected, unless the additional inspections are (a) necessary to follow up on a preoperational inspection or one or more violations, (b) required by a uniformly applied risk-based schedule established by the Department, (c) necessary to investigate a complaint regarding the hotel, or (d) otherwise deemed necessary by the Commissioner or his designee to protect the health and safety of the public.

If at any time the Commissioner finds that a hotel, restaurant, summer camp, or campground is not in compliance with applicable provisions of this title or regulations of the Board, he may revoke or suspend the license of that hotel, restaurant, summer camp, or campground.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 35-4, 35-6, 35-7, 35-15, 35-23, 35-46, 35-47, 35-51, 35-56; 1981, c. 468; 1996, cc. 200, 834; 2016, c. 581; 2017, c. 465.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 200 and 834 are identical, and deleted “hotel” preceding “restaurant” in the first sentence and added the present second sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 581 substituted “at least annually, with no more than 12 months elapsing between each such inspection” for “periodically, but not less often than annually” in the first sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 465 added the second sentence in the first and second paragraphs.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Food prepared in home or church for charitable purposes. —

A private kitchen in a home or church is not subject to food preparation and service requirements of the State Health Commissioner when the kitchen is used to prepare food to donate to a charitable organization, where the charitable organization is engaged in a food distribution program for the needy. However, the Board of Health may issue advisory guidelines, which reasonably should be considered by those preparing the food. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mark D. Sickles, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 15-063, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (7/22/16).

§ 35.1-23.
State institutions with dining accommodations to request inspections.

The head of every state institution with dining accommodations shall request the Commissioner to inspect such dining accommodations not less often than annually. Upon receipt of any such request, the Commissioner shall cause the dining accommodations to be so inspected and a report to be filed with the institution.

History.

1981, c. 468.

§ 35.1-24.
Advice and assistance to applicants for hotel and restaurant licenses.

The Commissioner may provide for consultative advice and assistance, within such limitations and restrictions as he deems proper, to any person who applies for a license provided for in this chapter.

History.

1981, c. 468.